Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.090

Itemized receipt to be given.

Every officer, when requested so to do, shall make out a bill of his or her fees in every case, and for any services, specifying each particular item thereof, and receipt the same when it is paid, which bill of fees shall always be subject to examination and correction by the courts. Any officer who fails to comply with the requirements of this section shall be liable to the person paying the fees in treble the amount so paid.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4019; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.090. Prior: (i) 1890 p 315 s 40; RRS s 4222. (ii) Code 1881 s 2102; 1869 p 374 s 24; 1863 p 398 s 3; 1861 p 41 s 3; 1854 p 376 s 6; RRS s 4235.]